Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6902
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Urban Redevelopment Act, the definitions found in sections 77-6903 to 77-6918 shall be used.

Laws 2021, LB544, § 2.